Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325F.079] PRODUCTS CONTAINING FD&C YELLOW NO. 5 OR 6. new text end new text begin (a) A person is prohibited from knowingly selling, offering to sell, distributing, or offering for use to a school, as defined in section 120A.22, subdivision 4, foods that contain FD&C Yellow No. 5 or 6. new text end new text begin (b) This section does not apply to home schools. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end